Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 31. Drainage Districts with County Commissioners

§ 51-31-1.
Powers of drainage districts.

Each drainage district heretofore organized in this state and each drainage district hereafter organized therein shall be a body corporate, shall have authority to sue in its own corporate name and be sued therein, may contract and be contracted with, may plead and be impleaded, and where organized or operating under the provisions of this chapter in its name may do and perform any and all things necessary and authorized by this chapter. All such acts may be done by its commissioners in the name of the district.

As an alternative to any existing right, power, and authority given to any drainage district operated by a board of county drainage commissioners, or to such commissioners, by the laws of the State of Mississippi now or hereafter enacted, all the provisions of the statutes of the State of Mississippi now or hereafter enacted relative to drainage districts operated by local commissioners, and to such local commissioners, shall apply to any drainage district heretofore or hereafter organized and operated by a board of county drainage commissioners, and to such commissioners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1707; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4295; 1930, § 4401; 1942, §§ 4606, 4606.8; Laws, 1964, ch. 209, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1964).

§ 51-31-3.
Definitions.

The terms “benefits” and “betterments,” as used in this chapter are interchangeable and shall be construed as synonymous. The terms “ditches” and “drains” shall be construed to also include levees and closed drains, such as tiling, as well as open ditches.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4324; 1930, § 4423; 1942, § 4628; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-5.
General authority of drainage districts.

Drainage districts may hereafter be organized in this state under the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of reclaiming wet, swamp, or overflowed lands for agricultural and sanitary purposes conducive to public health in the manner hereinafter provided and, when so organized, shall consist of a system of artificial main drains, lateral drains or ditches, natural drains and water courses, or levees. To the end that the purposes of the organization of such districts according to this system may be attained, they shall have and are given full power and authority to construct or to cause to be constructed such artificial main drains and ditches, lateral drains and ditches, and tile drains over the lands of others or over or on lands which may be acquired by said district, and to alter, deepen, or improve any and all natural drains and water courses as it may be necessary to alter, deepen, or improve so that a complete system of such drains may exist in the district for agricultural and sanitary purposes. Such districts may also, in addition to the construction of such drains, construct or erect over the land of others, or over the lands to be acquired by the drainage district or commission for that purpose, such levees as may be necessary to protect or reclaim any lands from overflow from any source.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1683; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4264; 1930, § 4374; 1942, § 4579; Laws, 1924, ch. 266.

§ 51-31-7.
Exercise of authority.

All drainage districts of the state heretofore organized or that may be hereafter organized, except as otherwise provided in Chapters 29 and 33 of this title, shall severally exercise their respective powers and be managed by three county drainage commissioners of the county in which the organization of the district was had and by the chancery court or chancellor in vacation of such county, as hereinafter provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4371; 1942, § 4576.

§ 51-31-9.
Selection of county drainage commissioners.

In every county in this state in which there is now a drainage district and in which a drainage district may hereafter be created or be proposed to be created under this chapter, the board of supervisors of such county shall select three county drainage commissioners for such county. The term of office of each commissioner shall be six years and until his successor is selected and has qualified, with said terms expiring at two-year intervals to insure the selection of one new commissioner every two years. Any vacancy in office of a county drainage commissioner in any county may be filled by the board of supervisors at any regular meeting of such board, which board is given the authority to fill all unexpired terms of any commissioner in the county.

Every resident citizen of any county, being the owner of land in said county and over 25 years of age, of good reputation, and of sound mind and judgment shall be eligible to hold the office of county drainage commissioner in the county of his residence.

If any commissioner shall refuse or neglect to discharge the duties imposed upon him by virtue of this chapter, or shall neglect or refuse to qualify as such commissioner after being selected for such office, the other two commissioners shall proceed to exercise the duties of their office and the business of said drainage district until the next meeting of said board of supervisors, when the office of the party refusing to perform or qualify shall be filled by the selection of another party in his stead.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, §§ 1682, 1719; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4261, 4308; 1930, §§ 4372, 4373, 4412; 1942, §§ 4577, 4578, 4617.

§ 51-31-11.
Oath and bond of drainage commissioners.

Each person selected county drainage commissioner shall, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of the office, give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). Such commissioner shall take and subscribe to an oath of office before said clerk that he will faithfully discharge the duties of the office, which oath shall also be filed with the said clerk.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1682; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4261; 1930, § 4373; 1942, § 4578; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 40; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 51-31-13.
Compensation of commissioners.

The commissioners each shall receive per diem compensation as provided by Section 25-3-69 for each day’s actual service, not exceeding four (4) days in any one (1) calendar month, to be allowed on an itemized account rendered to the board of drainage commissioners and approved by the chancery court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1716; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4305; 1930, § 4409; 1942, § 4614; Laws, 1932, ch. 241; Laws, 1958, ch. 457; Laws, 1971, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 374, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 51-31-15.
Quorum.

A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of a majority of their number in any matter within their duties and authority under this chapter shall be sufficient to bind the said board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1691; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4271; 1930, § 4380; 1942, § 4585.

§ 51-31-17.
Secretary and treasurer of drainage districts.

After the organization of a drainage district, the commissioners shall elect a secretary and treasurer, who may be a member of the board or may be any person qualified to fill the position. He shall give bond in such sum as the commissioners, with the approval of the chancellor, may determine and shall receive such compensation as the commissioners may allow, subject to approval by the chancellor. Such secretary and treasurer shall receive from the county tax collector, whose duty it shall be to collect, all monies levied by said drainage commissioners. The commissioners, with the approval of the chancellor, may designate the depository for such funds; such depository to be a qualified county depository; and upon their failure so to do, the funds shall be deposited as is now provided by law for funds belonging to the treasury of the county. The drainage commissioners of a district which has no bonds outstanding or which has a surplus fund in the treasury, by and with the approval of the chancellor, may place the surplus funds in a qualified county depository on savings account for six (6) months or more, at a rate of interest of not less than two percent (2%), or may loan said surplus funds on land in the county in which the district is organized, at a rate of interest of not less than six percent (6%) and on such terms and for such time as the chancellor may direct. Any such depository shall be eligible to hold funds of the district to the extent that it is qualified as a depository for county funds.

It shall be the duty of the treasurer to keep proper books to be furnished him by the commissioners, in which he shall keep an accurate account of all moneys received by him and of all disbursements of the same. He shall pay out no money except upon the order of a majority of the commissioners, shall carefully preserve on file all orders for the payment of money given him by the commissioners, and shall turn over all books, papers, vouchers, moneys and other property belonging to said district, in his hands as such treasurer, to his successor in office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1704; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4292; 1930, § 4400; 1942, § 4605; Laws, 1914, ch. 272; Laws, 1938, ch. 256; Laws, 1988, ch. 473, § 18, eff from and after December 1, 1988.

§ 51-31-19.
Employment of counsel.

The drainage commissioners may employ an attorney to assist in the formation and administration of the drainage district, and to represent the district in all matters of a legal nature, at a fixed or agreed compensation, subject to the confirmation of the chancery court or chancellor in vacation, who may decrease but not increase such compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4447; 1942, § 4673.

§ 51-31-21.
Creation of drainage districts on petition.

Whenever a majority of the owners of lands within a district proposed to be organized into a drainage district, who shall have arrived at lawful age and who represent one third in area of the lands in such proposed district, or whenever one third of the land owners in such proposed district owning more than one half of the lands in said district desire to organize a drainage district for the construction of drains or ditches across the lands of others for agricultural and sanitary purposes, or to maintain and keep in repair any such drains and ditches heretofore constructed, or to establish in said district a combined system of drainage or protection from wash or overflow for agricultural and sanitary purposes, and to construct and maintain the same by special assessment upon the property benefited thereby, such owners may file in the chancery court a petition signed by a majority of the owners of said land who own one third of the lands proposed to be included in said district, or by one third of the owners of said lands who own more than one half of the lands in said proposed drainage district to be organized as aforesaid, setting forth the proposed name of said drainage district, the necessity for the same, the description of the lands to be included in said drainage district, the names of the owners when known, together with the post-office address of such owners if the same can be ascertained, and may pray for the organization of a drainage district by a name to be given to the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1684; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4265; 1930, § 4375; 1942, § 4580.

§ 51-31-23.
Jurisdiction of organization.

Where the land to be included in a proposed drainage district lies wholly within one county or a judicial district of a county, the petition for the organization of the district shall be filed in the chancery court of such county or judicial district. Where the lands to be included in such proposed drainage district lie in two or more districts or counties in this state, the petition shall be filed in the chancery court of the county or judicial district in which the greatest or greater number of acres of land to be included lie. Such chancery court or the chancellor thereof shall have jurisdiction of the entire drainage district, whether all of the proposed lands of the drainage district lie within the chancery court district, or a part of the lands lie outside thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1685; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4266; 1930, § 4376; 1942, § 4581; Laws, 1924, ch. 265.

§ 51-31-25.
Notice of petition.

Upon the petition being filed in the office of the clerk of said chancery court, said clerk shall cause three weeks’ notice of the filing of said petition to be given, addressed “To all persons interested,” by posting notices thereof at the door of the courthouse of the county or counties in which the district is situated and in at least ten of the most public places in said proposed district, and also by publishing said notice at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper or newspapers published in the county in which the larger part of said district lies, if there be any newspaper published in said county. Such notice shall state when and in what court said petition was and is filed, with the general description of the land included in the said proposed drainage district and the boundaries of said drainage district, and when the said petitioners will ask a hearing of said petition. If any of the landowners in said district are nonresidents of said county or counties in which said proposed district will lie, or nonresidents of this state, the petition shall be accompanied by an affidavit giving the names and post office address of said nonresidents, if known, and if unknown, stating that upon diligent inquiry their places of residence and post offices cannot be ascertained; and the clerk shall send a copy of the notice which has been published as above provided by registered mail to each of said nonresidents whose residence or post office is known, which notice shall be mailed by said clerk not later than five days before the date set for hearing of the petition. The certificate of the clerk, with registered letter receipts attached, or the affidavit of any other credible person affixed to copy of such notice shall be sufficient evidence of the posting, mailing, and publication of such notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1687; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4267; 1930, § 4377; 1942, § 4582; Laws, 1910, ch. 188.

§ 51-31-27.
Date of hearing.

The chancery court in which such petition shall be filed may hear the petition at any term thereof, or the chancellor of said court may fix a time to hear such petition at any time in vacation, may determine all matters pertaining thereto and all subsequent proceedings of the district when organized under this chapter, may adjourn the hearing from time to time, and may continue the case for want of sufficient notice or other good cause. If said petition shall prove defective in any manner, the petitioners, upon motion, shall be permitted to amend the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1688; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4268; 1930, § 4378; 1942, § 4583.

§ 51-31-29.
Hearing of petitions.

Upon the day set for hearing said petition or a day to which same may be continued by the court or chancellor, all parties interested may appear and contest the same; and if the contestants file a petition signed by one third of the landowners in such proposed district owning more than one half of the lands in said district, then said original petition shall be dismissed. The court shall first determine whether the petition filed by the contestants is signed by persons of lawful age who represent one third of the landowners in such proposed district owning more than one half of the lands in said district. If it is so signed, the court or chancellor shall enter an order dismissing the original petition. If it is not so signed, then at the first hearing on the original petition the only questions to be passed upon by the court shall be: first, whether the petition is signed by the number of qualified signers required by this chapter; second, whether the required notices by publications, mail, and posting have been given; third, whether the lands of said proposed drainage district or any part thereof required a combined system of drainage; fourth, whether the creation of the district would meet a public necessity and would be conducive to the public welfare. If the court or chancellor shall find in favor of the petitioners upon all of these points, he shall enter an order to that effect, refer the said petition to the drainage commissioners of said county for proceedings thereon in compliance with this chapter, and fix a day upon which such commissioners shall meet to consider the same, and investigate the lands in the said proposed drainage district. All deeds made for the purpose of defeating or aiding the prayer of such petition, not made in good faith and for a valuable consideration, shall be taken and held to be in fraud of the provisions of this chapter; and the holders thereof shall not be considered as owners thereof in construing the provisions hereof. Upon said first hearing if the court or chancellor shall find that said petition is not signed as required by this chapter or that notices have not been given as required thereby, the court or chancellor may allow the petitioners to amend the same or may continue said petition for further hearing, with leave to the petitioners to give proper affidavit of any two or more signers of the said petition that they have examined said petition, that they are acquainted with the land and locality of such proposed district, and that such petition is signed by the number of landowners required by this chapter who are of lawful age. Such affidavit may be taken by the court or chancellor as prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated.

If the court or chancellor shall find against the petitioners upon any one or more of the points above provided, then said petition shall be dismissed; and in any dismissal under this section, all costs shall be adjudged against the petitioners for the organization of said proposed drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1689; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4269; 1930, § 4379; 1942, § 4584; Laws, 1924, ch. 264; Laws, 1932, ch. 285.

§ 51-31-31.
Landowners may sign petition at hearing.

At the time of the hearing of the petition for the organization of any district, any landowner or landowners desiring so to do may sign said petition and ask that his lands be attached to and made part of said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1725; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4317; 1930, § 4421; 1942, § 4626.

§ 51-31-33.
Commissioners to estimate cost.

As soon as may be after such petition shall be referred to said commissioners, or within such time as the court or chancellor may direct, the commissioners shall meet and go upon said lands and examine the same, and the lands over which the work is proposed to be constructed, and determine: first, the starting point, route, and termini of the proposed work, the location and size of the main ditch to be constructed in said drainage district, which in their opinion will successfully drain the said lands, and whether the drainage of the lands in such proposed drainage district is possible or not, provided that any ditch already constructed in such proposed drainage district may be used as a “main”, or part of a main ditch, if found expedient and sufficient for the purposes of the district; second, the probable cost of same, including expenses and court costs; third, what land will be injured or damaged by the proposed work and the probable aggregate amount of damages such lands will sustain by reason of the laying out and construction of such ditch or ditches; fourth, what lands will be benefited by the construction of the proposed work, and whether the aggregate amount of benefits will equal or exceed the cost of the construction of such work. In the examination of such district and determination of the questions for said commissioners to determine, the said commissioners are authorized and empowered to employ an engineer to go with them upon the lands of said district and examine the same, make a map and profile thereof, and an estimate of the size and depth of the ditch or ditches required for main outlets for the drains of said lands, and the probable cost, and a profile thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1692; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4272; 1930, § 4381; 1942, § 4586; Laws, 1924, ch. 264.

§ 51-31-35.
Proceedings on report of commissioners.

The commissioners shall also find and determine whether all of the lands in said proposed drainage district will be benefited thereby, or drain into and have their outlet by and through the drains and ditches to be constructed in said proposed drainage district. If they shall find, by reason of any errors, mistakes, or misunderstanding, that any part of the lands described in said petition do not drain into said watershed and proposed ditches and drains, they may report that the same shall be excluded from said district when organized. Upon the report of the commissioners being filed with the clerk of the court in which such proceedings are had, the said clerk shall cause three weeks’ notice thereof to be given, addressed “To all persons interested,” by publication in some newspaper in said county in which such proceedings are had, if there be any newspaper so published. If there be no newspaper so published, the notice shall be posted for three weeks in ten conspicuous places in said district, but he shall not be required to mail notices to any persons or give any other or further notice than the mere publication thereof. Such notice shall state the time of filing such report, that a map and description of the work laid off and proposed to be constructed is on file in his office, and a description of the lands, if any, proposed to be thrown out or excluded from said district, and upon what day application will be made for confirmation of said report, at which time all persons interested may appear and contest the confirmation thereof, or propose that the report ought to be modified in any particular, and offer any competent evidence in support thereof. The day fixed by the clerk for the hearing of said report shall be at a certain day of the next succeeding term of said court as provided by this chapter, or at a certain day in vacation when the chancellor of said court may appear and hear the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1693; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4273; 1930, § 4382; 1942, § 4587.

§ 51-31-37.
Disposition of report.

If upon the hearing of said report and of objections made thereto, the court or chancellor shall be of opinion that said drainage district should be organized, he shall order the confirmation of said report and declare said district duly organized. If it shall appear to the court or chancellor that additional ditches or drains for main outlets not named in the report are necessary, the court or chancellor shall modify the same to conform to the equities in the premises; or if not sufficiently informed, the court or chancellor may refer the said report back to the commissioners for correction, may order the commissioners to correct and reform their report, and may make directions how they shall reform their report. The court may make all necessary orders in the premises for the continuance of the hearing of said report and the confirmation thereof.

If the report be referred back to the commissioners for amendment, the court or chancellor may fix a day when the commissioners may again present their report, in which case the hearing shall stand adjourned to that date and no further notice shall be required thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, §§ 1694, 1695; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4274, 4275; 1930, §§ 4383, 4384; 1942, §§ 4588, 4589.

§ 51-31-39.
Form of court’s order.

If, after hearing all objections, if any, to the report of the commissioners and all applications, if any, to annex other lands to the proposed district by the owners of such lands, the court or chancellor finds that a drainage district should be organized, the map of the same shall be recorded and the order may be entered according to the findings of the court or chancellor, substantially as follows:

“The State of Mississippi County of Term, A.D. 20. In the matter of the petition to organize drainage district in the county of and State of Mississippi. This day the report of the drainage commissioners of said county, filed in this cause, having been heard, and it appearing to the court or chancellor that due notice has been given “to all persons interested” for the length of time and in the manner required by law of the application to this court for the confirmation of said report, and the court or chancellor having duly examined said report and considered all objections to the same, it is ordered by the court that the report of said commissioners (or if modified by the court, say as modified by the court) be, and the same is, hereby confirmed; and the court further finds that the work proposed in said petition to be done will be beneficial for agricultural and sanitary purposes to the owners of the lands within said proposed district. And the court also finds that the persons who have signed said petition are of lawful age and owners of land in number and quantity as required by law. And it is further hereby ordered and decreed by the court that said district be, and the same is, hereby duly organized as a body politic and corporate by the name and style of drainage district in the county of and the State of Mississippi.”

Click to view

But if the court, after hearing said report and objections, finds that the work proposed in said petition and the report with estimated costs by the drainage commissioners will not be sufficiently beneficial and justifiable for agricultural and sanitary purposes to the owners of the lands within said proposed drainage district, then an order shall be entered on the minutes of the court dismissing the petition and disallowing the organization of the proposed drainage district; and all costs and expenses shall be adjudged against the petitioners for the proposed drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1696; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4276; 1930, § 4385; 1942, § 4590; Laws, 1910, ch. 189; Laws, 1932, ch. 285.

§ 51-31-41.
District declared organized.

Upon entering such order of record upon the minutes of said court, said district is hereby declared by law to be organized as a drainage district, by the name mentioned in such petition and order of the court or chancellor in vacation and by the boundaries fixed by the order confirming the report of said commissioners, and is hereby declared to be a body politic and corporate by the name mentioned in said order of the court, with the right to have perpetual succession and to adopt and use a corporate seal. The commissioners and their successors in office shall, from the entry of such order of confirmation, constitute the corporate authorities of said district and shall exercise the functions conferred upon them by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1697; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4277; 1930, § 4386; 1942, § 4591.

§ 51-31-43.
Preliminary expenses.

All moneys that have been advanced or expended in good faith by parties interested in the organization of any district, necessary for the preliminary work in organization, such as surveys, attorneys’ fees, and incidentals thereto, may be repaid by the drainage commissioners as follows: If the district is organized, to be paid as a part of the costs of said district; but if the organization of the district is denied, the court or chancellor in vacation may make such orders and decrees as may appear to be equitable and just to all parties interested towards providing for the payment of such sums, together with such sums as the commissioners have expended or contracted for in good faith after the reference of the petition to them, and to this end may assess an acreage tax against such lands in such district which were owned by the persons signing the original petition praying that the district might be organized. After the petition for the organization of a district is filed and referred to the commissioners, they are authorized and empowered to issue certificates of the district to raise funds to have all necessary surveys made and to pay all necessary expenses and costs incurred in the preliminary work prior to the organization thereof, which certificates shall bear interest at the rate of 6% from their dates, but no certificate shall be made payable for a longer period than two years from its date. These certificates shall be paid as soon as the district is organized and sufficient funds come into the hands of the commissioners to pay same. Where any district shall fail to be organized solely by reason of the fact that a sufficient number of petitioners signing the original petition withdrew therefrom so as to leave an insufficient number of petitioners or an insufficient acreage represented by the petitioners remaining, and the chancery court or chancellor shall so state in his decree, the entire costs of the proceedings shall be decreed against the lands of such petitioners so withdrawing, on an acreage pro rata basis.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4283; 1930, § 4391; 1942, § 4596; Laws, 1912, ch. 196; Laws, 1920, ch. 287.

§ 51-31-45.
Assessment roll.

As soon as practicable after the entry of the order organizing a drainage district, the drainage commissioners shall go upon the lands of said district, examine the same, and assess the benefits to be derived by each separate tract of land for the proposed work, putting down in dollars and cents the amount of such benefits to be derived by such tract. They shall also estimate and put down in another column the amount of damages, if any, that any of the owners of said land may, in the opinion of such commissioners, sustain by reason of the construction of such work over their land in such district; shall make an estimate of the costs of draining said district, apportioned to each tract of land; and shall make and file a schedule or assessment roll of the same, which shall be substantially in the following form:

EstimatedCostof Work Name ofOwner Descriptionof Land Amount ofBenefits Amount ofDamages Assess-ment Sub Div. Sec. T.R. and acres $ $ $ $

Click to view

Provided that, for the purpose of providing funds with which to clean out, restore, repair and rehabilitate the whole or any part of the drainage system of such district or for the purpose of cooperating with the United States or any agency thereof in such works, there may be imposed a uniform assessment on each acre of unsubdivided land lying within the district, and a uniform assessment by lot on an acreage basis on subdivided land lying within the district, and the records required in this chapter shall show the amount of the assessment in lieu of the amount of benefits to accrue to each tract. Taxes levied hereunder are hereby declared to be taxes for maintenance purposes and shall not diminish in any manner the amount of assessed benefits in any such district which is otherwise available for the payment of any outstanding bonds of such district.

The assessments provided for in this section may be made even though evidences of indebtedness have been issued or validated or both prior thereto, but the lien of the holders of any such indebtedness shall not be impaired thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1698; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4278; 1930, § 4387; 1942, § 4592; Laws, 1912, ch. 196; Laws, 1977, ch. 332, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 392, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 51-31-47.
Notice of assessments.

When the commissioners shall have completed their assessments of damages and benefits, they shall file the same with the clerk of the chancery court; and the clerk is authorized to set down and fix a time for the hearing of objections to such assessments, at the request of said commissioners, at any time that the court or chancellor in vacation may be able to hear the same as herein provided. The clerk shall cause a notice to be published at least once a week for two successive weeks, of the time set for hearing objections to such assessments, which time for hearing shall not be less than fifteen days nor longer than thirty days from the time of filing the same, unless a longer time shall be ordered by the court or chancellor or requested by the commissioners. Said publication shall be made in any newspaper published in the county, if there be one published in the county where the cause is pending; otherwise, by posting written notices in ten public places in the district, and shall be sufficient, and the only notice required of the filing of said assessment roll and the time set for hearing objections thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1700; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4284; 1930, § 4392; 1942, § 4597; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-49.
Hearing objections.

The commissioners and landowners shall appear at the time and place set for hearing objections to said assessment roll, and the court or chancellor in vacation shall hear all objections that may be made, by the commissioners, landowners, or other persons interested, to the amount of benefit assessed or damage allowed to any tract or tracts of land on said assessment roll or to the assessments as a whole. After hearing all evidence offered, the court or chancellor in vacation shall direct the commissioners to make such alterations as shall be deemed just and equitable, by raising or lowering all or any assessment as the court may deem proper for the accomplishment of the work; and any changes so made by the court or chancellor shall be final unless appeal be taken.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1701; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4285; 1930, § 4393; 1942, § 4598; Laws, 1910, ch. 190.

§ 51-31-51.
Assessments confirmed.

Any party in interest may appeal to the supreme court of the state within ten days after the assessments have been confirmed or passed upon as provided in Section 51-31-49. The record of the proceedings or the bill of exceptions in every case shall be required to be filed within thirty days after the hearing, and the appeal bond shall be filed and approved within ten days after such approval of the assessment. Each party appealing shall execute a separate appeal bond in a sum of not less than $100.00, and a greater penalty shall be required, where in the judgment of the chancellor or court, the costs in the case are likely to exceed the sum of $100.00. After ten days from the approval of the assessments, the decree shall be final as to all persons in interest who have not executed appeal bonds as herein provided or as the court may fix as to the amounts thereof. No appeals shall be allowed in the proceeding until after the assessments are made final by order of the court or chancellor, whether the appeal relates to the assessment or to other features of the proceeding; and no appeal or appeals shall stop the proceedings with reference to the organization and doing the work of the district, but the work and proceedings shall proceed the same as if no appeal or appeals had been had. In case of a reversal in any feature of the proceedings, the errors shall be corrected according to the mandate of the court, so that no injustice shall result from any error of the court first making the error.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1702; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4286; 1930, § 4394; 1942, § 4599; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-53.
Payment of assessments.

At the time of confirming the assessments of benefits and damages and the estimated costs of the work proposed, the court or chancellor may order the assessments to be paid in installments, in such amounts and at such times as may be convenient for the accomplishment of the work proposed or the payment of bonds issued therefor; otherwise, the whole amount of such assessments shall be payable on the confirmation of such assessments. The assessments and installments thereof shall draw interest at the rate of not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum, payable annually, from the date of the confirmation; but if any owner elects he may pay the whole amount of the assessment and interest against any part of his property, or all of it, before it becomes due and within thirty days from the date of the confirmation of the assessments and benefits and before the issuance of bonds for the district, and all such property paid on shall not be liable for the payment of such bonds and assessments further. All assessments for benefit and assessments for doing the work of the district shall be a lien upon the lands of the district, assessed specifically against such lands which have not had their assessments paid, and shall continue until such assessments are levied and paid. In case any assessment and accrued interest is not paid when due, the specific land against which said assessment is made shall be advertised and sold by the tax collector of the county, as he is required to sell lands delinquent for state or county taxes; and all the provisions of the laws of this state in reference to the sale of lands to enforce the payment of state and county taxes are hereby declared to be and hereby are made a part of this chapter to enforce the payment of the assessments herein authorized to be made. All drainage assessments shall be collected by the tax collector of the county at the same time and in the same manner as are state and county taxes, and the same penalties shall accrue for the nonpayment of drainage assessments as for nonpayment of state and county taxes.

At the time of confirming such assessments, the court or chancellor in vacation may authorize the levying of such portions of such assessments as may be necessary to pay the principal and interest on the bonds authorized to be issued, and to carry out the purposes for which the said district was formed and organized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1703; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4287; 1930, § 4395; 1942, § 4600; Laws, 1914, ch. 270; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1972.

§ 51-31-55.
Right of way agreements.

The commissioners shall also, as soon as said petition to organize said district has been referred to them by the court, proceed to procure the right of way for the main ditch or ditches of said district, as well as the right of way for any laterals, drains, or levees that may be decided upon, by agreements with the landowners over or through whose lands the same is to be constructed. They shall take releases of rights of way for the construction of such ditch or ditches from the landowners and file same with the clerk, who shall record them. If the commissioners shall not be able to agree with any landowner as to the amount of damages such owner should receive for the right of way over which such ditch or other improvements or work shall be constructed, the commissioners shall appraise the said lands needed for said purposes and proceed as directed in Section 51-31-57.

Should it be necessary for the successful prosecution of the work for an outlet or outlets to be obtained outside of the boundaries of the district, then the commissioners are authorized to obtain the same by contract with the interested parties or by eminent domain proceedings, on the approval of the chancery court or chancellor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4179; 1930, § 4388; 1942, § 4593; Laws, 1912, ch. 196; Laws, 1920, ch. 287.